Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 1 Georgia Building Authority (Markets)

Cross references.

Authority of Commissioner with regard to establishment, operation, and maintenance of farmers’ markets, §

2-10-50

et seq.

Georgia Building Authority, §

50-9-1

et seq.

Power of state to incur debt generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VII, Sec. IV, Para. I et seq. and §

50-17-20

et seq.

2-10-1 through 2-10-39.
[Reserved]

History.

Ga. L. 1955, p. 224, §§ 1-8, 10-39; Ga. L. 1957, p. 3, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 85, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1967, p. 652, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 866, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 418; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 46; Ga. L. 1988, p. 426, § 1; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 224, § 1, effective July 1, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 224, § 1 repealed and reserved this article, effective July 1, 2008.